el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για ψάρια & υδρόβια ζώα > Επεξεργασίες νερού ενυδρείου: Έλεγχος φυκιών; Μηχανήματα αφαίρεσης αμμωνίας; Επεξεργασίες για μύκητες & βακτήρια; Αφαιρετικά νιτρικών; Ρυθμιστές PH; Μέσα εξουδετέρωσης νερού βρύσης; Καθαριστές νερού; Ρυθμιστές νερού
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za ribe in vodne živali > Preparati za akvarijsko vodo: Zatiranje alg; Odstranjevalci amonijaka; Sredstva za odstranjevanje glivic in bakterij; Odstranjevalci nitratov; Sredstva za uravnavanje PH; Sredstva za razstrupljanje vode iz pipe; Prečiščevalci vode; Sredstva za izboljšanje vode
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Hal- és vízi kellékek > Akváriumi vízkezelések: Algaszabályozás; Ammóniaeltávolítók; Gombás és bakteriális kezelések; Nitráteltávolítók; PH-beállítók; Csapvíz-méregtelenítők; Víztisztítók; Vízkondicionálók
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Fisk og vandforsyninger > Vandbehandling til akvarium: Algekontrol; Ammoniakfjernere; Svampe- og bakteriebehandlinger; Nitratfjernere; PH-justeringer; Postevandsafgiftningsmidler; Vandrensere; Vandkonditioneringsmidler
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Fish & Aquatic Supplies > Aquarium Water Treatments: Algae Control; Ammonia Removers; Fungal & Bacterial Treatments; Nitrate Removers; PH Adjusters; Tap Water Detoxifiers; Water Clarifiers; Water Conditioners
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์ทางน้ำและปลา > การดูแลรักษาน้ำในตู้ปลา: ตัวควบคุมสาหร่าย; สารกำจัดแอมโมเนีย; การดูแลรักษาเชื้อราและแบคทีเรีย; สารกำจัดไนเตรต; สารปรับค่า PH; สารล้างพิษในน้ำประปา; ตัวกรองน้ำให้สะอาด; เครื่องปรับสภาพน้ำ
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły i akcesoria dla rybek > Preparaty do wody w akwariach: Preparaty do usuwania glonów; Preparaty do usuwania amoniaku; Preparaty do usuwania grzybów i bakterii; Preparaty do usuwania azotanów; Preparaty regulujące PH; Oczyszczacze wody z kranu; Preparaty zwiększające przejrzystość wody; Uzdatniacze wody
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Potřeby pro ryby a vodní živočichy > Přípravky na úpravu akvarijní vody: Odstraňovače řasy; Odstraňovače čpavku (amoniaku); Ošetření proti plísním a bakteriím; Odstraňovače dusičnanů; Úprava PH; Detoxikátory vody z kohoutku; Čističky vody; Přípravky na úpravu vody
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Zierfisch- Aquarien- und Teichbedarf > Wasseraufbereitungsgeräte: Algenbekämpfung; Ammoniakentferner; Pilz- und Bakterienbekämpfung; Nitratentferner; PH-Einsteller; Leitungswasser-Entgiftungsmittel; Wasserklärmittel; Wasseraufbereiter
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 鱼类和水族用品 > 水族箱水净化/调节剂: 藻类控制; 除氨剂; 真菌和细菌处理剂; 硝酸盐去除剂; PH 调节剂; 自来水解毒剂; 水质净化剂; 水质调节剂
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre rybička a akváriá > Postupy ošetrenia vody v akváriu: Kontrola rias; Odstraňovače amoniaku; Postupy proti plesniam a baktériám; Odstraňovače dusičnanov; Regulátory PH; Detoxikačné prípravky na vodu z vodovodu; Čističe vody; Zmäkčovače vody
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Benodigdheden voor vissen en water > Behandeling van aquariumwater: Algenbestrijding; Ammoniakverwijderaars; Schimmel- en bacteriële behandeling; Nitraatverwijderaars; pH-regelaars; Kraanwaterontgifters; Waterzuiveraars; Waterconditioners
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > 魚・水産用品 > 水槽用水質調整剤: 藻類の防除; アンモニア除去剤; 真菌・細菌処理; 硝酸塩除去剤; PH調整剤; 水道水の解毒剤; 水槽用浄水器; 整水器
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Fiske- og vannutstyr > Vannbehandling for akvarier: Algekontroll; Ammoniakkfjernere; Sopp- og bakteriebehandlinger; Nitratfjernere; PH-justeringer; Rensemidler for springvann; Klaringsmiddel for vann; Behandlingsmiddel for vann
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru pești și acvaristică > Tratamente pentru apă pentru acvariu: Controlul algelor; Substanțe pentru eliminarea amoniacului; Tratamente fungice și bacteriene; Substanțe pentru eliminarea nitraților; Substanțe pentru ajustarea pH-ului; Substanțe pentru detoxifierea apei de la robinet; Substanțe pentru limpezirea apei; Substanțe pentru condiționarea apei
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Peixes e suprimentos aquáticos > Tratamentos para água de aquário: Controle de algas; Removedores de amônia; Tratamentos fúngicos e bacterianos; Removedores de nitrato; Ajustadores de PH; Desintoxicantes de água de torneira; Clarificadores de água; Condicionadores de água
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Риби и артикули за акваристика > Препарати за обработка на водата: Контрол на водорасли; Препарати за отстраняване на амоняк; Обработка срещу гъбички и бактерии; Препарати за отстраняване на нитрати; Регулатори на киселинността; Детоксикатори на чешмяна вода; Избистрители за вода; Омекотители за вода
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для рыб и аквариумов > Аквариумная химия: Средства от водорослей (альгициды); Средства для нейтрализации аммиака; Препараты от грибков и патогенных бактерий; Средства для нейтрализации нитратов; Регуляторы уровня pH; Детоксикаторы водопроводной воды; Очистители воды; Кондиционеры для воды
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Kala- ja akvaariotarvikkeet > Akvaariovedenhoito: Levänhallinta; Ammoniakin poistoaineet; Sienien ja bakteerien hallinta-aineet; Nitraattien poistoaineet; pH:n säätöaineet; Hanaveden puhdistusaineet; Vedenpuhdistusaineet; Vedenhoitoaineet
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Poissons et fournitures aquatiques > Produits d’entretien pour aquariums: Contrôle des algues; Dissolvants d’ammoniac; Traitements fongiques et bactériens; Dissolvants de nitrate; Ajusteurs de pH; Détoxifiants d’eau du robinet; Clarificateurs d’eau; Conditionneurs d’eau
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Balık ve Su Malzemeleri > Akvaryum Su Arıtıcıları: Yosun Kontrolü; Amonyak Gidericiler; Mantar ve Bakteri Tedavileri; Nitrat Gidericiler; PH Ayarlayıcılar; Musluk Suyu Detokslayıcıları; Su Arıtma Cihazları; Su Hazırlayıcılar
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Artigos aquáticos e para peixes > Tratamentos de água para aquários: Controlo de algas; Removedores de amoníaco; Tratamentos para fungos e bactérias; Removedores de nitrato; Reguladores de PH; Desintoxicadores de água canalizada; Clarificadores de água; Condicionadores de água
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho cá & động vật thủy sinh > Sản phẩm xử lý nước bể cá: Thuốc diệt rêu tảo; Sản phẩm khử amoniac; Dung dịch trị nấm & diệt khuẩn; Sản phẩm khử nitrat; Bột điều chỉnh độ pH; Sản phẩm khử độc nước máy; Dung dịch làm sạch nước; Dung dịch điều hòa nước
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 어류/수족관 용품 > 수족관 정수 약품: 조류 관리; 암모니아 제거제; 곰팡이/세균 치료제; 질산염 제거제; PH 조절기; 수돗물 중화제; 물 정화제; 물 컨디셔너
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Forniture ittiche e acquatiche > Prodotti trattamento acqua degli acquari: Algae Control; Eliminatori di ammoniaca; Trattamenti fungini e batterici; Eliminatori di nitrati; Regolatori del PH; Disintossicanti dell'acqua del rubinetto; Chiarificatori d'acqua; Condizionatori d'acqua
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės žuvims ir kitiems vandens gyvūnams > Akvariumų vandens priedai: Dumblių kontrolė; Amoniako šalinimo priemonės; Grybelių ir bakterijų naikinimo priemonės; Nitratų šalinimo priemonės; PH reguliatoriai; Vandentiekio vandens detoksikatoriai; Vandens skaidrinimo priemonės; Vandens kondicionieriai
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za ribe i vodeni svijet > Pročišćivači vode za akvarij: Kontrola algi; Sredstva za uklanjanje amonijaka; Liječenje gljivica i bakterija; Sredstva za uklanjanje nitrata; Sredstva za prilagođavanje pH-a; Detoksifikatori vode iz slavine; Pročišćivači vode; Uređaji za regeneraciju vode
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Fisk och vattentillbehör > Vattenbehandlingar för akvarier: Algkontroll; Ammoniakborttagare; Svamp- och bakteriebehandlingar; Nitratborttagare; PH-justerare; Kranvattensavgiftningsmedel; Vattenrengörare; Vattenkonditioneringsmedel
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 魚和水族用品 > 水族箱水處理設備: 藻類控制; 除氨劑; 真菌和細菌處理產品; 硝酸鹽去除劑; 酸鹼值調節劑; 自來水排毒劑; 淨水器; 水質調整器
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Suministros para peces y acuarios > Tratamientos del agua de acuarios: Control de algas; Eliminadores de amoníaco; Tratamientos fúngicos y bacterianos; Eliminadores de nitrato; Ajustadores de PH; Desintoxicantes de agua del grifo; Clarificadores de agua; Acondicionadores de agua